Repository navigation
Testing notes
Supreme Overlord edited this page May 30, 2026
·
4 revisions
These are oddities, discrepancies, or holes discovered while writing software tests and doing statistical analysis on the BuNaMo dataset.
- Potential discrepancy: 1.6.2 The Dative Plural Case: as na seirbhísí poiblí is shown, but according to the software library, it should lenite to phoiblí since the dative ends in a slender vowel.
In 2.2.2: 1st declension, Genitive Singular:
- Potential discrepancy: Compound words formed with -teach become genitive -tí. No idea why these are 1st declension when teach itself is unclassified. Found with díonteach and craobhtheach (not sure why this is lenited either, possible historical reason perhaps).
- Dictionary incorrect? catacóm is listed as 1st declension, but it does not follow 1st declension rules. I suspect it is 3rd declension. As it gets the -a suffix.
- leann is a 3rd declension noun as given in the db. See https://www.focloir.ie/en/dictionary/nid/leann
- There appears to be another pattern not mentioned in the Standard such that [broad vowel] + í + [broad vowel] just drops the last vowel. E.g. claíomh -> claímh not claíoimh
- muineál -> muiníl. It appears to be the only word that has that vowel combination.
- Several words ending in -éach change to -éigh
- A few words change úch to úigh, most of them are proper nouns.
- One example of eas -> eis for polysyllabic word: gaistreintríteas -> gaistreintríteis, not gaistreintrítis
- One example of ea -> eai: "bligeard" => "bligeaird", not "bligird"
In 2.3.2: 2nd declension, Genitive Singular:
-
scidil is an exception to the syncopation rule, most words with this pattern change to
-idle - blocshliabh is another strange one. The genitive also de-lenites the s: blocsléibhe